Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-198
Prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

A person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony if he or she threatens or attempts to threaten harm to a member or an employee of the Board of Parole with the purpose to influence a decision, an opinion, a recommendation, a vote, or any other exercise of discretion as member or employee of the board or if he or she privately addresses to any member or employee of the board any representation, entreaty, argument, or other communication designed to influence the outcome of any matter which is or may come before the board on the basis of considerations other than those authorized by law.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 29, p. 3087;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 310;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 24.